Utah statutes.
55-5-1.   Blind persons -- Operation of vending stands or enterprise in public buildings and on public property.

For the purpose of providing blind persons with an opportunity to become self-supporting, enlarging the economic opportunities of the blind and stimulating the blind to greater efforts in striving to make them self-supporting, blind persons under the provisions of this act shall be authorized to operate vending stands or other enterprises in state, county, or municipal buildings, parks or other property owned by the state of Utah, where in the discretion of the head of the department or agency in charge of the maintenance of the building, park or other property owned by the state of Utah or political subdivisions thereof such vending stands or other enterprises may be properly and satisfactorily operated by blind persons.



No Change Since 1953

